Illinois, session 104th, HB4153.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 14-104.10 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/14-104.10)7    Sec. 14-104.10. Federal or out-of-state employment. 8    (a) A contributing employee may establish additional 9service credit for periods of full-time employment by the 10federal government or a unit of state or local government 11located outside Illinois for which he or she does not qualify 12for credit under any other provision of this Article, provided 13that (i) the amount of service credit established by a person 14under this subsection Section shall not exceed 8 years or 40% 15of his or her membership service under this Article, whichever 16is less, (ii) the amount of service credit established by a 17person under this subsection Section for federal employment, 18when added to the amount of all military service credit 19granted to the person under this Article, shall not exceed 8 20years, and (iii) any credit received for the federal or 21out-of-state employment in any federal or other public 22employee pension fund or retirement system has been terminated 23or relinquished. Credit may not be established under this   HB4153- 2 -LRB104 15799 JDS 28997 b1subsection Section for any period of military service or for 2any period for which credit has been or may be established 3under Section 14-110 or any other provision of this Article.4    In order to establish service credit under this subsection 5Section, the applicant must submit a written application to 6the System by June 30, 1999, including documentation of the 7federal or out-of-state employment satisfactory to the Board, 8and pay to the System (1) employee contributions at the rates 9provided in this Article based upon the person's salary on the 10last day as a participating employee prior to the federal or 11out-of-state employment, or on the first day as a 12participating employee after that employment, whichever is 13greater, plus (2) an amount determined by the Board to be equal 14to the employer's normal cost of the benefits accrued for that 15employment, plus (3) regular interest on items (1) and (2) 16from the date of conclusion of the employment to the date of 17payment.18    (b) A contributing employee may establish additional 19service credit for periods of full-time employment with the 20federal government or a unit of state or local government 21located outside Illinois for which he or she does not qualify 22for credit under any other provision of this Article, provided 23that (i) the amount of service credit established by a person 24under this subsection shall not exceed 9 years, (ii) the 25amount of service credit established by a person under this 26subsection for federal employment, when added to the amount of   HB4153- 3 -LRB104 15799 JDS 28997 b1all military service credit granted to the person under this 2Article, shall not exceed 14 years, and (iii) any credit 3received for the federal or out-of-state employment in any 4federal or other public employee pension fund or retirement 5system has been terminated or relinquished. Credit may not be 6established under this subsection for any period of military 7service or for any period for which credit has been or may be 8established under Section 14-110 or any other provision of 9this Article. 10    In order to establish service credit under this 11subsection, the applicant must submit a written application to 12the System within 6 months after the effective date of this 13amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, including 14documentation of the federal or out-of-state employment 15satisfactory to the Board, and pay to the System (1) employee 16contributions at the rates provided in this Article based upon 17the person's salary on the last day as a participating 18employee prior to the federal or out-of-state employment, or 19on the first day as a participating employee after that 20employment, whichever is greater, plus (2) an amount 21determined by the Board to be equal to the employer's normal 22cost of the benefits accrued for that employment, plus (3) 23regular interest on items (1) and (2) from the date of 24conclusion of the employment to the date of payment. 25(Source: P.A. 90-32, eff. 6-27-97; 90-655, eff. 7-30-98; 2690-766, eff. 8-14-98.)   HB4153- 4 -LRB104 15799 JDS 28997 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.